Utah statutes.
17B-2a-808.   Public transit district board of trustees powers and duties --
Adoption of ordinances, resolutions, or orders -- Effective date of
ordinances.
(1)  The powers and duties of a board of trustees of a public transit district
stated in this section are in addition to the powers and duties stated in
Section 17B-1-301.
(2)  The board of trustees of each public transit district shall:
(a)  appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, as provided in Section
17B-2a-811;
(b)  determine the transit facilities that the district should acquire or
construct;
(c)  supervise and regulate each transit facility that the district owns and
operates, including:
(i)  fixing rates, fares, rentals, and charges and any classifications of
rates, fares, rentals, and charges; and
(ii)  making and enforcing rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and
schedules for or in connection with a transit facility that the district owns
or controls;
(d)  control the investment of all funds assigned to the district for
investment, including funds:
(i)  held as part of a district's retirement system; and
(ii)  invested in accordance with the participating employees' designation or
direction pursuant to an employee deferred compensation plan established and
operated in compliance with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(e)  invest all funds according to the procedures and requirements of Title
51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;
(f)  if a custodian is appointed under Subsection (3)(d), pay the fees for the
custodian's services from the interest earnings of the investment fund for
which the custodian is appointed;
(g) (i)  cause an annual audit of all district books and accounts to be made
by an independent certified public accountant;
(ii)  as soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, submit to
the chief administrative officer and legislative body of each county and
municipality with territory within the district a financial report showing:
(A)  the result of district operations during the preceding fiscal year; and
(B)  the district's financial status on the final day of the fiscal year; and
(iii)  supply copies of the report under Subsection (2)(g)(ii) to the general
public upon request in a quantity that the board considers appropriate;
(h)  report at least annually to the Transportation Commission created in
Section 72-1-301 the district's short-term and long-range public transit
plans, including the transit portions of applicable regional transportation
plans adopted by a metropolitan planning organization established under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 134;
(i)  direct the internal auditor appointed under Section 17B-2a-810 to conduct
audits that the board of trustees determines to be the most critical to the
success of the organization; and
(j)  hear audit reports for audits conducted in accordance with Subsection
(2)(i).
(3)  A board of trustees of a public transit district may:
(a)  subject to Subsection (5), make and pass ordinances, resolutions, and
orders that are:
(i)  not repugnant to the United States Constitution, the Utah Constitution,
or the provisions of this part; and
(ii)  necessary for:
(A)  the government and management of the affairs of the district;
(B)  the execution of district powers; and
(C)  carrying into effect the provisions of this part;
(b)  provide by resolution, under terms and conditions the board considers
fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific
approval by the board, if the payment is:
(i)  for a purpose for which the expenditure has been previously approved by
the board;
(ii)  in an amount no greater than the amount authorized; and
(iii)  approved by the general manager or other officer or deputy as the board
prescribes;
(c) (i)  hold public hearings and subpoena witnesses; and
(ii)  appoint district officers to conduct a hearing and require the officers
to make findings and conclusions and report them to the board; and
(d)  appoint a custodian for the funds and securities under its control,
subject to Subsection (2)(f).
(4)  A member of the board of trustees of a public transit district or a
hearing officer designated by the board may administer oaths and affirmations
in a district investigation or proceeding.
(5) (a)  The vote of the board of trustees on each ordinance shall be by roll
call vote with each affirmative and negative vote recorded.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (5)(b)(ii), the board of trustees may adopt a
resolution or order by voice vote.
(ii)  The vote of the board of trustees on a resolution or order shall be by
roll call vote if a member of the board so demands.
(c) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(c)(ii), the board of trustees of
a public transit district may not adopt an ordinance unless it is:
(A)  introduced at least a day before the board of trustees adopts it; or
(B)  mailed by registered mail, postage prepaid, to each member of the board
of trustees at least five days before the day upon which the ordinance is
presented for adoption.
(ii)  Subsection (5)(c)(i) does not apply if the ordinance is adopted by a
unanimous vote of all board members present at a meeting at which at least 3/4
of all board members are present.
(d)  Each ordinance adopted by a public transit district's board of trustees
shall take effect upon adoption, unless the ordinance provides otherwise.
